src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/V-tahtma83_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `tahtma: # Verb (83) `nõstma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tahtma+V+Inf/mA: tahtma
     tahtma+V+Inf: tahtaq
     tahtma+V+Act+PrfPrc: tahtnuq
     tahtma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [tahet, tahetu]

     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taha
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [tahat, tahadõq]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taht
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tahamiq
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tahatiq
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tahtvaq
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [tahtsõ, tahi]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [tahtsõt, tahtsõq, tahtsõdõq, tahit, tahiq, tahidõq]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [tahtsõ, taht́]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [tahtsõmiq, tahimiq]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [tahtsõtiq, tahitiq]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tahtsõq, tahtsõvaq, tahiq, tahivaq]
     tahtma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: taha

     tahtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taheda
     tahtma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tahetas

     tahtma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tahtva

     tahtma+V+Jus: tahtkuq
